Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB4188.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 626b. A person An individual who operates a vehicle upon on a highway or a frozen public lake, stream, or pond or other place open to the general public including an area designated for the parking of vehicles in a careless or negligent manner likely to endanger any person or property, but without wantonness or recklessness, is responsible for a civil infraction. Enacting section 1. This amendatory act takes effect 90 days after the date it is enacted into law.